Utah statutes.
7-1-1005.   Admissibility of information restricted.
(1)  Information obtained directly or indirectly from a financial institution
in violation of Sections 7-1-1001 through 7-1-1003 may not be admissible in
any court of this state against the person entitled to notice.
(2)  This section does not apply in any action:
(a)  between the financial institution and the person otherwise entitled to
notice; or
(b)  in which it is claimed that the financial institution has been the victim
of fraud, embezzlement or any other criminal act committed by the person
otherwise entitled to notice.
